Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8104
Act; exemptions.

Unless
otherwise specifically included, the Nebraska Protection in Annuity Transactions
Act does not apply to transactions involving:

(1) Direct response solicitations if there is no recommendation based
on information collected from the consumer pursuant to the act; or

(2) Contracts used to fund:

(a) An employee pension or welfare benefit plan that is covered by the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974;

(b) A plan described by section 401(a), 401(k), 403(b), 408(k), or 408(p)
of the Internal Revenue Code if established or maintained by an employer;

(c) A government or church plan defined in section 414 of the Internal
Revenue Code, a government or church welfare benefit plan, or a deferred compensation
plan of a state or local government or tax exempt organization under section
457 of the Internal Revenue Code;

(d) A nonqualified deferred compensation arrangement established or
maintained by an employer or plan sponsor;

(e) Settlements of or assumptions of liabilities associated with personal
injury litigation or any dispute or claim resolution process; or

(f) Contracts entered into pursuant to the Burial Pre-Need Sale Act.

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 29;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 24.

Burial Pre-Need Sale Act, see section 12-1101.